Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.427

Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program—Termination.

The Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program is terminated July 1, 2025, as provided in RCW 43.131.428.

[ 2019 c 176 s 3.]